Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4619
Manufacturer; maintain sales records; commission; rules and regulations.

Every manufacturer shall maintain a record of the name and address of the first purchaser of each manufactured home or recreational vehicle for purposes other than resale and, to the maximum extent feasible and reasonable, shall maintain procedures for ascertaining the name and address of any subsequent purchaser and shall maintain a record of names and addresses so ascertained. Such records shall be kept for each manufactured home or recreational vehicle produced by a manufacturer. The commission may establish by rule and regulation procedures to be followed by manufacturers in establishing and maintaining such records, including procedures to be followed by distributors and dealers to assist manufacturers to secure the information required by this section.

Laws 1975, LB 300, § 18;

Laws 1985, LB 313, § 22;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 99;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 143.